South Carolina, session 2025-2026, H3740.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of South Carolina: SECTION 1.  Section 8-7-90 of the S.C. Code is amended to read: Section 8-7-90.  All officers and employees of this State or a political subdivision of this State, including school districts, who are either enlisted or commissioned members of the South Carolina National Guard, the United States Army Reserve, the United States Air Force Reserve, the United States Naval Reserve, the United States Marine Corps Reserve, or the United States Coast Guard Reserve are entitled to leaves of absence from their respective duties without loss of pay, time, or efficiency rating for one or more periods not exceeding an aggregate of fifteen thirty regularly scheduled work days in any one year during which they may engage in training or any other duties ordered by the Governor, the Department of Defense, the Department of the Army, the Department of the Air Force, the Department of the Navy, the Department of the Treasury, or any other department or agency of the government of the United States having authority to issue lawful orders requiring military service. Saturdays, Sundays, and state holidays may not be included in the fifteen thirty-day aggregate unless the particular Saturday, Sunday, or holiday to be included is a regularly scheduled work day workday for the officer or employee involved. In the event any such person is called upon to serve during an emergency he is entitled to such leave of absence for not exceeding thirty additional days. A state employee in a full-time position who serves on active duty in a combat zone and who has exhausted all available leave for military purposes is entitled to receive up to thirty additional days of military leave in any one year. As used in this section, "in any one year" means either a calendar year or, in the case of members required to perform active duty for training or other duties within or on a fiscal year basis, the fiscal year of the National Guard or reserve component issuing the orders. The provisions of this section must be construed liberally to encourage and allow full participation in all aspects of the National Guard and reserve programs of the Armed Forces of the United States and to allow state officers and employees who are enlisted or commissioned members of the National Guard or reserve components to excel in military and emergency preparedness and service by taking full advantage of all career-enhancing assignments and training opportunities. SECTION 2.  This act takes effect upon approval by the Governor. ----XX----